Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Chapter 9. Debt Adjusting or Credit Arranging
[Repealed]

§§ 85-9-1 through 85-9-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 465, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§85-9-1. [Codes, 1942, § 306-01; Laws, 1971, ch. 302, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1971.]

§85-9-3. [Codes, 1942, § 306-02; Laws, 1971, ch. 302, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1971.]

§85-9-5. [Codes, 1942, § 306-03; Laws, 1971, ch. 302, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 507, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 5, 1991).]